Washington statutes.
RCW 18.64.480

Waiver request to allow importation of prescription drugs from Canada.

(1) By September 1, 2005, the commission shall, in consultation with the department and the health care authority, submit a waiver request to the federal food and drug administration that authorizes the importation of prescription drugs from Canada.

(2) Upon approval of the federal waiver allowing for the importation of prescription drugs from Canada, the commission, in consultation with the department and the health care authority, shall license Canadian pharmacies that provide services to Washington residents under RCW 18.64.350 and 18.64.360.

[ 2013 c 19 s 28; 2005 c 275 s 4.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2005 c 275: See note following RCW 18.64.350.